Utah statutes.
41-3-305.   In-transit permits -- Limits -- Tax provision.
(1)  Under rules made by the administrator, in-transit permits may be issued
by the division or its authorized representatives.
(2)  In-transit permits allow use of the highways for a time period not to
exceed 96 hours.
(3)  Before issuing any in-transit permit, the  division or its authorized
representative shall be satisfied that the person applying for the permit is
the owner of the motor vehicle or the owner's representative, and if the owner
or driver is a Utah resident, that the motor vehicle complies with the
security requirements of Sections 31A-22-302 and 31A-22-303.
(4)  The division or its authorized representative may issue in-transit
permits without requiring a property tax clearance for the motor vehicle on
which the permit is to be used.
